Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
71-9106
Act; how construed.

Nothing in the Concussion
Awareness Act shall be construed to create liability for or modify the liability
or immunity of a school, school district, city, village, business, or nonprofit
organization or the officers, employees, or volunteers of any such school,
school district, city, village, business, or nonprofit organization.

Laws 2011, LB260, § 6.